test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-mitâs_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mitâs : :

      # Core

      # Poss
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nitâs
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kitâs
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: otâsa
      

      # Der/Dim
      mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Sg: mitâs+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Sg
      

      # Poss # Sg
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nitâs
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kitâs
      
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nitâsinân
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px12Pl+Sg: kitâsinaw
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kitâsiwâw
      
      
      mitâs+N+A+D+PxX+Sg: mitâs
      

      # Poss # Pl
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nitâsak
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kitâsak
      
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nitâsinânak
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px12Pl+Pl: kitâsinawak
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kitâsiwâwak
      
      
      mitâs+N+A+D+PxX+Pl: mitâsak
      

      # Poss # Obv
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: nitâsa
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kitâsa
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: otâsa
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: nitâsinâna
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px12Pl+Obv: kitâsinawa
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kitâsiwâwa
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: otâsiwâwa
      mitâs+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otâsithiwa
      mitâs+N+A+D+PxX+Obv: mitâsa
      
